test/src/morphology/N-kyla_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kylä: # Noun (N_OZA) 'village / koira' - full paradigm
     kylä+N+Sg+Nom: kylä
     kylä+N+Sg+Gen: kylän
     kylä+N+Sg+Acc: [kylä, kylän]
     kylä+N+Sg+Par: kyliä
     kylä+N+Sg+Tra: kyläkse
     kylä+N+Sg+Abe: [kylättä, kylätä, kylättäh]
     kylä+N+Sg+Com: kylänke
     kylä+N+Sg+Ine: kyläs
     kylä+N+Sg+Ela: [kyläspäi, kyläs]
     kylä+N+Sg+Ill: kyläh
     kylä+N+Sg+Ade: kyläl
     kylä+N+Sg+Abl: [kylälpäi, kyläl]
     kylä+N+Sg+All: kyläle
     kylä+N+Sg+Ess: kylänny
     kylä+N+Sg+Ter: kylässäh
     kylä+N+Sg+Apr: kylällyö
     kylä+N+Sg+Prl: kyläči
     kylä+N+Pl+Nom: kylät
     kylä+N+Pl+Gen: kylien
     kylä+N+Pl+Acc: kylät
     kylä+N+Pl+Par: kylii
     kylä+N+Pl+Tra: kylikse
     kylä+N+Pl+Abe: [kylittä, kylitä, kylittäh]
     kylä+N+Pl+Com: kylienke
     kylä+N+Pl+Ine: kylis
     kylä+N+Pl+Ela: [kylispäi, kylis]
     kylä+N+Pl+Ill: kylih
     kylä+N+Pl+Ade: kylil
     kylä+N+Pl+Abl: [kylilpäi, kylil]
     kylä+N+Pl+All: kylile
     kylä+N+Pl+Ess: kylinny
     kylä+N+Pl+Ins: kylin
     kylä+N+Pl+Prl: kyliči
     kylä+N+Pl+Apr: kyliellyö
     kylä+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: kylägi
     kylä+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: kylängi
     kylä+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [kylägi, kylängi]
     kylä+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: kyliägi
     kylä+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: kyläksegi
     kylä+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [kylättägi, kylätägi, kylättähgi]
     kylä+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: kylänkegi
     kylä+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: kyläsgi
     kylä+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [kyläspäigi, kyläsgi]
     kylä+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: kylähgi
     kylä+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: kylälgi
     kylä+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [kylälpäigi, kylälgi]
     kylä+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: kylälegi
     kylä+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: kylännygi
     kylä+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: kylässähgi
     kylä+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: kylällyögi
     kylä+N+Sg+Prl+Clt/gi: kyläčigi
     kylä+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: kylätgi
     kylä+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: kyliengi
     kylä+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: kylätgi
     kylä+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: kyliigi
     kylä+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: kyliksegi
     kylä+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [kylittägi, kylitägi, kylittähgi]
     kylä+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: kylienkegi
     kylä+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: kylisgi
     kylä+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [kylispäigi, kylisgi]
     kylä+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: kylihgi
     kylä+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: kylilgi
     kylä+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [kylilpäigi, kylilgi]
     kylä+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: kylilegi
     kylä+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: kylinnygi
     kylä+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: kylingi
     kylä+N+Pl+Prl+Clt/gi: kyličigi
     kylä+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: kyliellyögi
